Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8030.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 45-2-3.3 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-2 entitled "General
Powers" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-2-3.3. Background checks.
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of the general or public laws to the contrary, any person
seeking to work or volunteer for a municipal recreation department, or any municipal recreation
department having the written authorization of a person seeking to work or volunteer for the
municipal recreation department, may request a Rhode Island criminal history background check
from their local police department for that person. The Rhode Island criminal history background
check shall be a certified true copy of the criminal record report and shall bear indicia of
authenticity including being printed on local police department letterhead with a raised seal and
bearing the signature of a duly appointed local police officer.
(b) Further, notwithstanding any provision of the general or public laws to the contrary,
any person seeking to work or volunteer for a fire department or fire district located in the town of
Burrillville, or any fire department or fire district having the written authorization of a person
seeking to work or volunteer for the fire department or fire district located in the town of
Burrillville, may request a Rhode Island criminal history background check from the Burrillville
Police Department for that person. The Rhode Island criminal history background check shall be a
certified true copy of the criminal record report and shall bear indicia of authenticity including
being printed on Burrillville Police Department letterhead with a raised seal and bearing the

signature of a duly appointed Burrillville Police Officer.
(c) Notwithstanding any provisions of the general or public laws to the contrary, any person
seeking to work or volunteer for a fire department or fire district located in the Town of South
Kingstown, including but not limited to the Union Fire District and the Kingston Fire District, shall
undergo a national and state criminal background in accordance with § 45-2-3.4. The applicant
shall apply to the bureau of criminal identification (BCI), department of attorney general, state
police, or the South Kingstown Police Department for a national and state criminal records check.
Fingerprinting shall be required. The applicant shall be responsible for the cost of conducting the
national and state criminal records check. The South Kingstown Police Department may request
and receive the results of such background check for purpose of determining eligibility for services.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005747
========
LC005747 - Page 2 of 3